Washington statutes.
RCW 9.91.144

Food stamps—Unlawful redemption.

A person who, in violation of 7 U.S.C. Sec. 2024(c), obtains and presents food stamps as defined by the federal food stamp act, as amended, 7 U.S.C. Sec. 2011 et seq., or food stamp benefits transferred electronically, for redemption or causes such stamps or benefits to be presented for redemption through the program established under RCW 74.04.500 is guilty of a class C felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.

[ 2003 c 53 s 51.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.